Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,238
Director; cooperation with state agencies; receipt of funds.

The Director of Agriculture may cooperate with and receive funds from other agencies or departments of the state for the purposes of section 81-2,236 and may accept from any political subdivision of the state, private association, or other source such funds, contributions, payments, gifts, or bequests as may be given or paid under contractual agreement to the department. Such funds shall be deposited in the Animal Damage Control Cash Fund.

Laws 1987, LB 102, § 8.